Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 137.225, as amended by section 55, chapter 70, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
137.225. (1)(a) At any time after the person  becomes eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, any person convicted of an offense , or found in  contempt of court,  who has fully
complied with and performed the  sentence of the court for the offense  or contempt finding , and
whose conviction  or finding  is described in subsection (5) of this section,  by motion may apply to
the court where the conviction  or finding  was entered  for entry of an order setting aside the con-
viction  or finding . A person who is still under supervision as part  of the sentence for the offense
that is the subject of the motion has not fully complied with or performed the sentence of the  court.
(b) A person is eligible to file a motion under paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) For a Class B felony, seven years from the date of conviction or the release of the person
from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(B) For a  Class C felony  or a finding of a person in contempt of court for violating an order
related to abuse or a person crime , five years from  the date of conviction  or finding,  or the re-
lease of the person from imprisonment for the conviction  or finding  sought  to be set aside, which-
ever is later.
(C) For a Class  A misdemeanor, three years from the date of conviction or the release of the
person from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(D) For a Class B or Class C misdemeanor, a violation or [ the] a finding of  a person in contempt
of court  not described in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph , one year  from the date of con-
viction or finding , or the release of the person from imprisonment for the  conviction or finding
sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(c) If no accusatory instrument is filed, at any time after 60 days from  the date the prosecuting
attorney indicates that the state has elected not to proceed with a prosecution or contempt  pro-
ceeding, an arrested, cited or charged person may apply  to the court in the county in which the
person was arrested, cited or charged, for entry of an order setting aside the record of  the arrest,
citation or charge.
(d) At any time after an acquittal or a  dismissal other than a dismissal described in paragraph
(c) of this subsection,  an arrested, cited or charged person may apply to the court in the county in
which the person was arrested, cited or charged, for entry of  an order setting aside the record of
the arrest, citation or charge.
Enrolled House Bill 2492 (HB 2492-A) Page 1
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person whose sentence of  probation was
revoked  may  not apply to the court for entry of an order setting aside the conviction  or finding for
which the person was sentenced to probation for a period of three years from  the date of revocation
or until the person becomes  eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, whichever oc-
curs later.
(f) If the offense classification of a conviction has been reduced by the court, the appli-
cable time period under paragraph  (b) of this subsection is the time period associated with
the reduced offense classification, calculated from the date of conviction or the  release of
the person from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
[(f)] (g)  A person filing a motion under this section is not required to pay  the filing fee estab-
lished under ORS 21.135.
(2)(a) A copy of the motion shall be served upon the office of  the prosecuting attorney who
prosecuted  the  offense  or charge of contempt , or who had authority to prosecute the charge if
there was  no accusatory instrument filed. The prosecuting attorney may object to a motion filed
under subsection (1)(a) of this section and shall notify the court and the person  of the objection
within 120 days of the date the motion was filed with the court.
(b) When  a prosecuting attorney is served with a copy of a motion to set aside a conviction  or
finding under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the prosecuting attorney shall provide  a copy of the
motion and notice of the hearing date to the victim, if any, [ of the offense ] by mailing a copy of  the
motion and notice to the victim’s last-known address.
(c) When a person  makes a motion under this section, the person shall forward to the Depart-
ment of State Police a full set of the person’s fingerprints on a fingerprint card or in any  other
manner specified by the department.
(d) When a person makes a motion under subsection (1)(a) of this  section, the person must pay
a fee to the Department of  State Police for the purpose of the department performing a criminal
record check. The department shall establish a fee in an amount not to exceed the  actual cost of
performing the criminal record check. If the department is  required to perform only one criminal
record check for the person, the department may only charge one fee, regardless of the number  of
counties in which the person is filing a motion to set aside a conviction,  finding, arrest, charge or
citation under this section. The department  shall provide a copy of the results of the criminal record
check to the prosecuting attorney.
(e) The prosecuting attorney may not charge the person a fee for performing the requirements
described in this section.
(3)(a) If an objection is received to a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the
court shall hold a hearing, and may require the filing of such affidavits and may  require the taking
of such proofs as the court deems proper. The court shall  allow the victim to make a statement at
the hearing. If the person is otherwise eligible for relief under this section,  the court shall grant the
motion and enter  an order as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection unless the court makes
written findings, by  clear and convincing evidence, that the circumstances and behavior of the per-
son, from the date of the conviction  or finding the person is seeking  to set aside to the date of the
hearing on the motion, do  not warrant granting the motion due to the circumstances and behavior
creating a risk to public safety. When determining whether the person’s circumstances and behavior
create a risk to  public safety, the court may only consider criminal behavior, or violations of regu-
latory law or administrative rule  enforced by civil penalty or other administrative sanction that
relate to the character of the conviction  or finding sought to be set aside. The court may not con-
sider nonpunitive civil liability,  monetary obligations and motor vehicle violations. Upon granting
the motion, the court  shall enter an appropriate order containing the original arrest or citation
charge, the conviction  charge, if different from the original, the date of charge, the submitting
agency and the disposition of the charge.  Upon the entry of the order, the person for purposes of
the law shall be deemed not to have been previously convicted, and the court shall issue  an order
sealing the  record of conviction and other official records in the case, including the records of ar-
rest, citation or charge.
Enrolled House Bill 2492 (HB 2492-A) Page 2
(b) The court shall grant a  motion filed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section, or under
subsection (1)(a) of this section if no  objection to the motion is received, and shall enter an appro-
priate order containing  the original arrest or citation charge, the conviction charge, if applicable
and different from the original, the date of charge, the submitting agency  and the disposition of the
charge. Upon the entry of the order, the person for purposes of the law shall be deemed not to  have
been previously convicted, arrested, cited or charged, and the court shall issue an order sealing  all
official  records  in the case, including the records of arrest, citation or charge, whether or not the
arrest, citation or charge resulted in a further criminal proceeding.
(4) The clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the order to such agencies as directed
by the court. A certified copy must be sent to the Department of Corrections when the order con-
cerns a conviction. Upon entry of  the order, the conviction, arrest, citation, charge or other pro-
ceeding shall be  deemed not to have occurred, and the person may answer accordingly any questions
relating to its occurrence.
(5) The provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section apply to [ a conviction for ] the  following
convictions and findings:
(a) A Class B felony, except for a violation of ORS 166.429 or  any crime classified as a person
felony as defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) Any misdemeanor, Class  C felony or felony punishable as a misdemeanor pursuant to ORS
161.705.
(c) An offense constituting a violation under state law or local ordinance.
(d) An offense committed before January 1, 1972, that, if committed after that date, would qualify
for an order under this section.
(e) The finding of a person in contempt of court.
(6) Notwithstanding  subsection (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this
section do not apply to a conviction for:
(a) Criminal mistreatment in the second degree under ORS 163.200 if the victim at the time  of
the crime was 65 years of age or older.
(b) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree under ORS 163.205 if the victim at  the time of the
crime was 65 years of age or older, or when the offense constitutes child abuse as defined  in ORS
419B.005.
(c) Endangering the welfare of a minor  under ORS 163.575 (1)(a), when the offense constitutes
child abuse as defined in ORS 419B.005.
(d) Criminally negligent homicide under ORS  163.145, when that offense was punishable as a
Class C felony.
(e) Assault in the third degree under ORS 163.165 (1)(h).
(f) Any sex crime, unless:
(A) The sex crime is listed in ORS 163A.140 (1)(a) and:
(i) The person has been relieved of the  obligation to report as a sex offender pursuant to a court
order entered under ORS 163A.145 or 163A.150; and
(ii) The person has not been convicted of, found guilty except for insanity of  or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the  juvenile court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; or
(B) The sex crime constitutes a Class C felony and:
(i) The person was under 16 years of age at the time of the offense;
(ii) The person is:
(I) Less than two years and 180 days older than the victim; or
(II) At least two years and 180 days older,  but less than three years and 180 days older, than
the victim and the court finds that setting aside  the conviction is in the interests of justice and of
benefit to the person and the community;
(iii) The  victim’s lack of consent was due solely to incapacity to consent by reason of being less
than a specified age;
(iv) The victim was at least 12 years of age at the time of the offense;
Enrolled House Bill 2492 (HB 2492-A) Page 3
(v) The person has not been convicted of,  found guilty except for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the  juvenile court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; and
(vi) Each conviction or finding described in this subparagraph involved the same victim.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section,  the provisions of subsection (1) (a) of this
section do not apply to:
[(a)] (A)  A conviction for a state or municipal traffic offense.
[(b)] (B)  A  person convicted[ , within the following applicable time period immediately preceding
the filing of the motion pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, ] of any other  offense, excluding
motor vehicle violations and unlawful possession of a controlled substance  constituting a drug
enforcement misdemeanor as described in section 35, chapter  70, Oregon Laws 2024, or found in
contempt of court for  violating an order related to abuse or a person crime, within the fol-
lowing applicable time period immediately preceding the filing of the motion pursuant to
subsection (1)(a) of this section,  whether or not the other conviction is for conduct associated
with the same criminal episode that caused the [ arrest, citation,  charge or ] conviction , or with the
same course of conduct that caused the finding,  that is sought to be set aside:
[(A)] (i) For a motion concerning a Class B felony, seven years.
[(B)] (ii) For a motion concerning a Class C felony or a  finding of a person in contempt of
court for violating an order related to abuse or a person crime , five years.
[(C)] (iii) For a motion concerning a Class A misdemeanor, three years.
[(D)] (iv)  For a motion concerning a Class B or  Class C misdemeanor a violation or a finding
of contempt of court  not described in sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph , one year.
(C) A person who at  the time the motion described in this section is pending before the
court is under  charge of commission of any crime or contempt of court for violating an order
related to abuse or a person crime.
[(c)] (b) A single violation, other than a motor vehicle violation, within the  time period specified
in paragraph [ (b)] (a)(B)  of this subsection is not a conviction  under this subsection.
Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, a conviction that has been set aside under this sec-
tion shall be considered for  the purpose of determining whether paragraph [ (b)] (a)(B)  of this sub-
section is applicable.
[(d) A person who at the time the motion authorized by subsection (1) of this section is pending
before the court is under charge of commission of any crime. ]
(8) The provisions of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section do not apply to :
(a) An arrest or citation for driving  while under the influence of intoxicants if the charge is
dismissed as a  result of the person’s successful completion of a diversion agreement described in
ORS 813.200.
(b) The dismissal of a citation for a traffic violation.
(c) A  person who at the time the motion described in this section is pending before the
court is under  charge of commission of any crime or contempt of court for violating an order
related to abuse or a person crime.
(9) The  provisions of subsection (1) of this section apply to convictions,  findings, arrests, cita-
tions and charges that occurred before, as well as those  that occurred after, September 9, 1971.
There is no time limit for making an application.
(10) For purposes of any civil action in which  truth is an element of a claim for relief or affir-
mative defense,  the provisions of subsection (3) of this section providing that the conviction,  finding,
arrest, citation, charge or other  proceeding be deemed not to have occurred do not apply and a
party may apply to the court for an order requiring disclosure of the official records  in the case as
may be necessary in the interest of justice.
(11)(a) Upon motion of any prosecutor or  defendant in a case involving records sealed under this
section, supported by affidavit showing  good cause, the court with jurisdiction may order the reo-
pening and disclosure of any records  sealed under this section for the limited purpose of assisting
Enrolled House Bill 2492 (HB 2492-A) Page 4
the investigation of the movant. However, such an order has no other  effect on the orders setting
aside the conviction  or finding,  or the arrest, citation or charge record.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  when an arrest, citation or charge de-
scribed in subsection (1)(c) of this section is set aside,  a prosecuting attorney may, for the purpose
of initiating a criminal proceeding within the  statute of limitations, unseal the records sealed under
this section by notifying the court with  jurisdiction over the charge, record of arrest or citation.
The prosecuting attorney shall notify the person who is the subject of  the records of the unsealing
under this paragraph by sending written notification to the person’s last known address.
(12) The State Court Administrator shall create forms to be used throughout the  state for
motions and proposed orders described in this section.
(13) As used in this section:
(a) “Affidavit” includes a declaration under penalty of perjury.
(b) “Order related to abuse or a person crime” means:
(A) A court  order issued under ORS 107.095 (1)(c) or (d), 107.700 to 107.735, 124.005 to
124.040, 133.035, 135.247 or 163.760 to 163.777; or
(B) A court order arising from a criminal case involving:
(i) A sex crime;
(ii) Stalking under ORS 163.732; or
(iii) A person felony or person Class A misdemeanor,  as those terms are defined in the
rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, committed  against the person’s family or
household member as defined in ORS 135.230.
[(b)] (c)  “Sex crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 137.225 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to
motions filed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Passed by House April 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2492 (HB 2492-A) Page 5